Utah statutes.
63M-7-602.   Reappointment -- Vacancies.
(1)  Members appointed to serve four-year terms shall be eligible for
reappointment one time.
(2)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement
shall be appointed for the unexpired term.
